Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2280
Cleanup testing.

Cleanup testing (1) shall include testing of one hundred percent of the breeding swine in an affected swine herd for the purpose of removing infected swine and may include testing of up to one hundred percent of all other swine on the same premises or (2) may include testing of up to one hundred percent of all swine on the premises in an affected swine herd without breeding swine for the purpose of removing infected swine.

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 30;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2221.07;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 44;

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 66;

Laws 2004, LB 837, § 1.